Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,126
Lists of taxpayers; other information; department provide; when.

The Department of Revenue shall not be required to provide lists of taxpayers or any other information from applications, returns, or other reports to any person except for statistical compilations and for the purposes of enforcing the tax laws of this state or when the department or the Tax Commissioner is specifically required to provide certain information under the laws of Nebraska.

Laws 1991, LB 773, § 7.